hr-HR: Materijal bubnja sušilice: Aluminij; Pocinčani čelik; Plastika; Polipropilen; Čelik premazan porculanom; Čelik premazan prahom; Nehrđajući čelik; Ostalo
nb: Materiale i tørketrommelen: Aluminium; Galvanisert stål; Plast; Polypropylen; Porselensbelagt stål; Pulverlakkert stål; Rustfritt stål; Annet
bg-BG: Материал на барабана на сушилнята: Алуминий; Поцинкована стомана; Пластмаса; Полипропилен; Порцеланово покритие върху стомана; Прахово боядисана стомана; Неръждаема стомана; Друго
pt-BR: Material do tambor da secadora: Alumínio; Aço galvanizado; Plástico; Polipropileno; Aço esmaltado; Aço revestido a pó; Aço inoxidável; Outro
tr: Kurutma tamburu malzemesi: Alüminyum; Galvanize çelik; Plastik; Polipropilen; Porselen kaplı çelik; Toz boyalı çelik; Paslanmaz çelik; Diğer
vi: Chất liệu lồng sấy: Nhôm; Thép mạ kẽm; Nhựa; Nhựa polypropylen; Thép tráng men sứ; Thép sơn tĩnh điện; Thép không gỉ; Khác
cs: Materiál bubnu sušičky: Hliník; Galvanizovaná ocel; Plast; Polypropylen; Ocel s porcelánovým smaltem; Práškově lakovaná ocel; Nerezová ocel; Jiný
ro-RO: Materialul tamburului uscătorului: Aluminiu; Otel galvanizat; Plastic; Polipropilenă; Oțel acoperit cu porțelan; Oțel cu acoperire pulbere; Oțel inoxidabil; Altele
lt-LT: Džiovyklės būgno medžiaga: Aliuminis; Galvanizuotas plienas; Plastikas; Polipropilenas; Porcelianu dengtas plienas; Milteliniu būdu dažytas plienas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Kita
sv: Material i torktumlartrumman: Aluminium; Galvaniserat stål; Plast; polypropen; Porslinsbelagt stål; Pulverlackerat stål; Rostfritt stål; Övrigt
ru: Материал барабана сушильной машины: Алюминий; Оцинкованная сталь; Пластик; Полипропилен; Эмалированная сталь; Сталь с порошковым покрытием; Нержавеющая сталь; Другой
en: Dryer drum material: Aluminum; Galvanized steel; Plastic; Polypropylene; Porcelain-coated steel; Powder-coated steel; Stainless steel; Other
pl: Materiał bębna suszarki: Aluminium; Stal cynkowana; Tworzywo sztuczne; Polipropylen; Stal emaliowana; Stal malowana proszkowo; Stal nierdzewna; Pozostałe
it: Materiale del tamburo dell'asciugatrice: Alluminio; Acciaio galvanizzato; Plastica; Polipropilene; Acciaio rivestito in porcellana; Acciaio verniciato a polvere; Acciaio inossidabile; Altro
nl: Materiaal van droogtrommel: Aluminium; Gegalvaniseerd metaal; Plastic; Polypropyleen; Met porselein bekleed staal; Poedergecoat staal; Roestvrij staal; Overig
el: Υλικό κάδου στεγνωτηρίου: Αλουμίνιο; Γαλβανισμένος χάλυβας; Πλαστικό; Πολυπροπυλένιο; Χάλυβας με πορσελάνινη επίστρωση; Χάλυβας με ηλεκτροστατική βαφή πούδρας; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Άλλο
sl-SI: Material bobna sušilnega stroja: Aluminij; Pocinkano jeklo; Plastika; Polipropilen; Jeklo s porcelanskim premazom; Prašno barvano jeklo; Nerjavno jeklo; Druga
hu: Szárítódob anyaga: Alumínium; Horganyzott acél; Műanyag; Polipropilén; Porcelánbevonatú acél; Porszórt acél; Rozsdamentes acél; Egyéb
fr: Matériau du tambour du sèche-linge: Aluminum; Acier aluminisé; Plastique; Polypropylène; Acier émaillé; Acier peint par poudrage; Acier inoxydable; Autre
da: Tørretumblers tromlemateriale: Aluminium; Galvaniseret stål; Plast; Polypropylen; Porcelænsbelagt stål; Pulverlakeret stål; Rustfrit stål; Andet
es: Material del tambor de la secadora: Aluminio; Acero galvanizado; Plástico; Polipropileno; Acero recubierto de porcelana; Acero con recubrimiento en polvo; Acero inoxidable; Otros
de: Trocknertrommelmaterial: Aluminium; Galvanisierter Stahl; Kunststoff; Polypropylen; Porzellanbeschichteter Stahl; Pulverbeschichteter Stahl; Edelstahl; Sonstiges
ko: 건조기 드럼 재질: 알루미늄; 아연도금강; 플라스틱; 폴리프로필렌; 도자기 코팅 강철; 분체 코팅 강철; 스테인리스 스틸; 기타
zh-TW: 烘衣機滾筒材質: 鋁製; 鍍鋅鋼; 塑膠; 聚丙烯; 琺瑯鋼; 粉末塗層鋼; 不銹鋼; 其他
th: วัสดุของถังอบผ้า: อะลูมิเนียม; เหล็กกล้ากัลวาไนซ์; พลาสติก; โพลิโพรพิลีน; เหล็กเคลือบพอร์ซเลน; เหล็กเคลือบสีฝุ่น; เหล็กสเตนเลส; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Material do tambor da máquina de secar: Alumínio; Aço galvanizado; Plástico; Polipropileno; Aço revestido com porcelana; Aço revestido a pó; Aço inoxidável; Outro
ja: 乾燥機ドラムの材質: アルミニウム; 亜鉛メッキスチール; プラスチック; ポリプロピレン; ホーロー加工スチール; 粉体塗装鋼; ステンレススチール; その他
sk-SK: Materiál bubna sušičky: Hliník; Pozinkovaná oceľ; Plast; Polypropylén; Porcelánom potiahnutá oceľ; Práškom lakovaná oceľ; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Iné
fi: Kuivausrummun materiaali: Alumiini; Galvanoitu teräs; Muovi; Polypropeeni; Posliinipäällysteinen teräs; Jauhemaalattu teräs; Ruostumaton teräs; Muu
zh-CN: 烘干机滚筒材质: 铝; 镀锌钢; 塑料; 聚丙烯; 搪瓷钢; 粉末涂层钢; 不锈钢; 其他